North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 4. Organization and System for Delivery of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.
§ 122C-116.
Status of area authority; status of consolidated human services agency.

An area authority is a local political subdivision of the State.

A consolidated human services agency is a department of the county.

History.

1977, c. 568, s. 1; c. 679, s. 7; 1979, c. 358, s. 2; 1981, c. 51, ss. 3, 4; c. 539, s. 1; 1983, c. 280; c. 383, s. 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 690, s. 10; 2012-151, s. 2(a).

§ 122C-117.
Powers and duties of the area authority. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The area authority shall do all of the following:

Engage in comprehensive planning, budgeting, implementing, and monitoring of community-based mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

Ensure the provision of services to clients in the catchment area, including clients committed to the custody of the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

Determine the needs of the area authority’s clients and coordinate with the Secretary and with the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety the provision of services to clients through area and State facilities.

Develop plans and budgets for the area authority subject to the approval of the Secretary. The area authority shall submit the approved budget to the board of county commissioners and the county manager and provide quarterly reports on the financial status of the program in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

Assure that the services provided by the county through the area authority meet the rules of the Commission and Secretary.

Comply with federal requirements as a condition of receipt of federal grants.

Appoint an area director in accordance with G.S. 122C-121(d).

Develop and submit to the board of county commissioners for approval the business plan required under

G.S. 122C-115.2

. A multicounty area authority shall submit the business plan to each participating board of county commissioners for its approval. The boards of county commissioners of a multicounty area authority shall jointly submit one approved business plan to the Secretary for approval and certification.

Perform public relations and community advocacy functions.

Recommend to the board of county commissioners the creation of local program services.

Submit to the Secretary and the board of county commissioners service delivery reports, on a quarterly basis, that assess the quality and availability of public services within the area authority’s catchment area. The service delivery reports shall include the types of services delivered, number of recipients served, and services requested but not delivered due to staffing, financial, or other constraints. In addition, at least annually, a progress report shall be submitted to the Secretary and the board of county commissioners. The progress report shall include an assessment of the progress in implementing local service plans, goals, and outcomes. All reports shall be in a format and shall contain any additional information required by the Secretary or board of county commissioners.

Comply with this Article and rules adopted by the Secretary for the development and submission of and compliance with the area authority business plan.

Coordinate with Treatment Accountability for Safer Communities for the provision of services to criminal justice clients.

Maintain a 24-hour a day, seven day a week crisis response service. Crisis response shall include telephone and face-to-face capabilities. Crisis phone response shall include triage and referral to appropriate face-to-face crisis providers and shall be initiated within one hour of notification. Crisis services do not require prior authorization but shall be delivered in compliance with appropriate policies and procedures. Crisis services shall be designed for prevention, intervention, and resolution, not merely triage and transfer, and shall be provided in the least restrictive setting possible, consistent with individual and family need and community safety.

An LME that utilizes single stream funding shall, on a biannual basis, report on the allocation of service dollars and allow for public comment at a regularly scheduled LME board of directors meeting.

Before an LME proposes to reduce State funding to HUD group homes and HUD apartments below the original appropriation of State funds, the LME must:

Receive approval of the reduction in funding from the Department, and

Hold a public hearing at an open LME board meeting to receive comment on the reduction in funding.

Have the authority to borrow money with the approval of the Local Government Commission.

Develop and adopt community crisis services plans in accordance with

G.S. 122C-202.2

.

(a1)

The area authority may contract to provide services to governmental or private entities, including Employee Assistance Programs.

The governing unit of the area authority is the area board. All powers, duties, functions, rights, privileges, or immunities conferred on the area authority may be exercised by the area board.

Within 30 days of the end of each quarter of the fiscal year, the area director and finance officer of the area authority shall provide the quarterly report of the area authority to the county finance officer. The county finance officer shall provide the quarterly report to the board of county commissioners at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board. The clerk of the board of commissioners shall notify the area director and the county finance officer if the quarterly report required by this subsection has not been submitted within the required period of time. This information shall be delivered to the county and, at the request of the board of county commissioners, may be presented in person by the area director or the director’s designee.

A multicounty area authority shall provide to each board of county commissioners of participating counties a copy of the area authority’s annual audit. The audit findings shall be presented in a format prescribed by the county and shall be read into the minutes of the meeting at which the audit findings are presented.

History.

1971, c. 470, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; c. 661; 1977, c. 568, s. 1; c. 679, s. 7; 1979, c. 358, ss. 1, 3, 14, 23; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1983, c. 383, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 830, s. 47(d); 1989, c. 625, s. 14; 1991, c. 215, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 749, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 4(t); 2000-137, s. 4(w); 2001-437, s. 1.10; 2001-487, s. 79.5; 2005-371, s. 2; 2006-142, s. 3(a); 2009-191, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2012-151, s. 9(a); 2017-186, s. 2(ooooo); 2018-33, s. 7.

Cross References.

As to quarterly reports by mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services area authority or county program, see

G.S. 153A-453

.

§ 122C-117.
Powers and duties of the area authority. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The area authority shall do all of the following:

Engage in comprehensive planning, budgeting, implementing, and monitoring of community-based mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

Ensure the provision of services to clients in the catchment area, including clients committed to the custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

Determine the needs of the area authority’s clients and coordinate with the Secretary and with the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety the provision of services to clients through area and State facilities.

Develop plans and budgets for the area authority subject to the approval of the Secretary. The area authority shall submit the approved budget to the board of county commissioners and the county manager and provide quarterly reports on the financial status of the program in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

Assure that the services provided by the county through the area authority meet the rules of the Commission and Secretary.

Comply with federal requirements as a condition of receipt of federal grants.

Appoint an area director in accordance with G.S. 122C-121(d).

Develop and submit to the board of county commissioners for approval the business plan required under

G.S. 122C-115.2

. A multicounty area authority shall submit the business plan to each participating board of county commissioners for its approval. The boards of county commissioners of a multicounty area authority shall jointly submit one approved business plan to the Secretary for approval and certification.

Perform public relations and community advocacy functions.

Recommend to the board of county commissioners the creation of local program services.

Submit to the Secretary and the board of county commissioners service delivery reports, on a quarterly basis, that assess the quality and availability of public services within the area authority’s catchment area. The service delivery reports shall include the types of services delivered, number of recipients served, and services requested but not delivered due to staffing, financial, or other constraints. In addition, at least annually, a progress report shall be submitted to the Secretary and the board of county commissioners. The progress report shall include an assessment of the progress in implementing local service plans, goals, and outcomes. All reports shall be in a format and shall contain any additional information required by the Secretary or board of county commissioners.

Comply with this Article and rules adopted by the Secretary for the development and submission of and compliance with the area authority business plan.

Coordinate with Treatment Accountability for Safer Communities for the provision of services to criminal justice clients.

Maintain a 24-hour a day, seven day a week crisis response service. Crisis response shall include telephone and face-to-face capabilities. Crisis phone response shall include triage and referral to appropriate face-to-face crisis providers and shall be initiated within one hour of notification. Crisis services do not require prior authorization but shall be delivered in compliance with appropriate policies and procedures. Crisis services shall be designed for prevention, intervention, and resolution, not merely triage and transfer, and shall be provided in the least restrictive setting possible, consistent with individual and family need and community safety.

An LME that utilizes single stream funding shall, on a biannual basis, report on the allocation of service dollars and allow for public comment at a regularly scheduled LME board of directors meeting.

Before an LME proposes to reduce State funding to HUD group homes and HUD apartments below the original appropriation of State funds, the LME must:

Receive approval of the reduction in funding from the Department, and

Hold a public hearing at an open LME board meeting to receive comment on the reduction in funding.

Have the authority to borrow money with the approval of the Local Government Commission.

Develop and adopt community crisis services plans in accordance with

G.S. 122C-202.2

.

(a1)

The area authority may contract to provide services to governmental or private entities, including Employee Assistance Programs.

The governing unit of the area authority is the area board. All powers, duties, functions, rights, privileges, or immunities conferred on the area authority may be exercised by the area board.

Within 30 days of the end of each quarter of the fiscal year, the area director and finance officer of the area authority shall provide the quarterly report of the area authority to the county finance officer. The county finance officer shall provide the quarterly report to the board of county commissioners at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board. The clerk of the board of commissioners shall notify the area director and the county finance officer if the quarterly report required by this subsection has not been submitted within the required period of time. This information shall be delivered to the county and, at the request of the board of county commissioners, may be presented in person by the area director or the director’s designee.

A multicounty area authority shall provide to each board of county commissioners of participating counties a copy of the area authority’s annual audit. The audit findings shall be presented in a format prescribed by the county and shall be read into the minutes of the meeting at which the audit findings are presented.

History.

1971, c. 470, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; c. 661; 1977, c. 568, s. 1; c. 679, s. 7; 1979, c. 358, ss. 1, 3, 14, 23; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1983, c. 383, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 830, s. 47(d); 1989, c. 625, s. 14; 1991, c. 215, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 749, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 4(t); 2000-137, s. 4(w); 2001-437, s. 1.10; 2001-487, s. 79.5; 2005-371, s. 2; 2006-142, s. 3(a); 2009-191, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2012-151, s. 9(a); 2017-186, s. 2(ooooo); 2018-33, s. 7; 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z).

Cross References.

As to quarterly reports by mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services area authority or county program, see

G.S. 153A-453

.

§ 122C-118.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-437, s. 1.11, effective July 1, 2002.

§ 122C-118.1.
Structure of area board.

An area board shall have no fewer than 11 and no more than 21 voting members. The board of county commissioners, or the boards of county commissioners within the area, shall appoint members consistent with the requirements provided in subsection (b) of this section. The process for appointing members shall ensure participation from each of the constituent counties of a multicounty area authority. If the board or boards fail to comply with the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, the Secretary shall appoint the unrepresented category. The boards of county commissioners within a multicounty area with a catchment population of at least 1,250,000 shall have the option to appoint members of the area board in a manner or with a composition other than as required by this section by each county adopting a resolution to that effect and receiving written approval from the Secretary. A member of the board may be removed with or without cause by the initial appointing authority. The area board may declare vacant the office of an appointed member who does not attend three consecutive scheduled meetings without justifiable excuse. The chair of the area board shall notify the appropriate appointing authority of any vacancy. Vacancies on the board shall be filled by the initial appointing authority before the end of the term of the vacated seat or within 90 days of the vacancy, whichever occurs first, and the appointments shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Within the maximum membership provided in subsection (a) of this section, the membership of the area board shall reside within the catchment area and be composed as follows:

At least one member who is a current county commissioner.

The chair of the local Consumer and Family Advisory Committee (CFAC) or the chair’s designee.

At least one family member of the local CFAC, as recommended by the local CFAC, representing the interests of the following:

Individuals with mental illness.

Individuals in recovery from addiction.

Individuals with intellectual or other developmental disabilities.

At least one openly declared consumer member of the local CFAC, as recommended by the local CFAC, representing the interests of the following:

Individuals with mental illness.

Individuals with intellectual or other developmental disabilities.

Individuals in recovery from addiction.

An individual with health care expertise and experience in the fields of mental health, intellectual or other developmental disabilities, or substance abuse services.

An individual with health care administration expertise consistent with the scale and nature of the managed care organization.

An individual with financial expertise consistent with the scale and nature of the managed care organization.

An individual with insurance expertise consistent with the scale and nature of the managed care organization.

An individual with social services expertise and experience in the fields of mental health, intellectual or other developmental disabilities, or substance abuse services.

An attorney with health care expertise.

A member who represents the general public and who is not employed by or affiliated with the Department of Health and Human Services, as appointed by the Secretary.

The President of the LME/MCO Provider Council or the President’s designee to serve as a nonvoting member who shall participate only in Board activities that are open to the public.

An administrator of a hospital providing mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse emergency services to serve as a nonvoting member who shall participate only in Board activities that are open to the public.Except as provided in subdivisions (12) and (13) of this subsection, an individual that contracts with a local management entity (LME) for the delivery of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services may not serve on the board of the LME for the period during which the contract for services is in effect. No person registered as a lobbyist under Chapter 120C of the General Statutes shall be appointed to or serve on an area authority board. Of the members described in subdivisions (2) through (4) of this subsection, the boards of county commissioners shall ensure there is at least one member representing the interest of each of the following: (i) individuals with mental illness, (ii) individuals with intellectual or other developmental disabilities, and (iii) individuals in recovery from addiction.

The board of county commissioners may elect to appoint a member of the area authority board to fill concurrently no more than two categories of membership if the member has the qualifications or attributes of the two categories of membership.

Any member of an area board who is a county commissioner serves on the board in an ex officio capacity at the pleasure of the initial appointing authority, for a term not to exceed the earlier of three years or the member’s service as a county commissioner. Any member of an area board who is a county manager serves on the board at the pleasure of the initial appointing authority, for a term not to exceed the earlier of three years or the duration of the member’s employment as a county manager. The terms of members on the area board shall be for three years, except that upon the initial formation of an area board in compliance with subsection (a) of this section, one-third shall be appointed for one year, one-third for two years, and all remaining members for three years. Members shall not be appointed for more than three consecutive terms.

Upon request, the board shall provide information pertaining to the membership of the board that is a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

An area authority that adds one or more counties to its existing catchment area under G.S. 122C-115(c1) shall ensure that the expanded catchment area is represented through membership on the area board, with or without adding area board members under this section, as provided in G.S. 122C-118.1(a).

History.

2001-437, s. 1.11(b); 2002-159, s. 40(a); 2006-142, s. 4(e); 2007-504, s. 1.4; 2010-31, s. 10.7; 2012-151, s. 3(a); 2013-85, ss. 6, 7; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor substituted “Article 8 of Chapter 163A” for “Chapter 120C” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the change to the reference in subsection (b).

§ 122C-118.2.
Establishment of county commissioner advisory board.

There is established a county commissioner advisory board for each catchment area, consisting of one county commissioner from each county in the catchment area, designated by the board of commissioners of each county. The county commissioner advisory board shall meet on a regular basis, and its duties shall include serving as the chief advisory board to the area authority and to the director of the area authority on matters pertaining to the delivery of services for individuals with mental illness, intellectual or other developmental disabilities, and substance abuse disorders in the catchment area. The county commissioner advisory board serves in an advisory capacity only to the area authority, and its duties do not include authority over budgeting, personnel matters, governance, or policymaking of the area authority.

Each board of commissioners within the catchment area shall designate from its members the commissioner to serve on the county commissioner advisory board. Each board of commissioners may determine the manner of designation, the term of service, and the conditions under which its designee will serve on the county commissioner advisory board.

History.

2013-85, s. 8.

§ 122C-119.
Organization of area board.

The area board shall meet at least six times per year.

Meetings shall be called by the area board chairman or by three or more members of the board after notifying the area board chairman in writing.

Members of the area board elect the board’s chairman. The term of office of the area board chairman shall be one year. A county commissioner area board member may serve as the area board chairman.

The area board shall establish a finance committee that shall meet at least six times per year to review the financial strength of the area program. The finance committee shall have a minimum of three members, two of whom have expertise in budgeting and fiscal control. The member of the area board who is the county finance officer or individual with financial expertise shall serve as an ex officio member. All other finance officers of participating counties in a multicounty area authority may serve as ex officio members. If the area board so chooses, the entire area board may function as the finance committee; however, its required meetings as a finance committee shall be distinct from its meetings as an area board.

History.

1971, c. 470, s. 1; 1973, c. 455; c. 476, s. 133; c. 1355; 1975, c. 400, ss. 1-4; 1977, c. 568, s. 1; 1979, c. 358, ss. 6, 23; c. 455; 1981, c. 52; 1983, c. 6; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 749, s. 4; 2001-437, s. 1.11(c).

§ 122C-119.1.
Area Authority board members’ training.

All members of the governing body for an area authority shall receive initial orientation on board members’ responsibilities and annual training provided by the Department which shall include fiscal management, budget development, and fiscal accountability. A member’s refusal to be trained shall be grounds for removal from the board.

History.

1995, c. 507, s. 23.3; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 749, s. 5; 2012-151, s. 4(a).

§ 122C-120.
Compensation of area board members.

Area board members may receive as compensation for their services per diem and a subsistence allowance for each day during which they are engaged in the official business of the area board. The amount of the per diem and subsistence allowances shall be established by the area board. The amount of per diem allowance shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00). Reimbursement of subsistence expenses shall be at the rates allowed to State officers and employees under G.S. 138-6(a)(3).

Area board members may be reimbursed for all necessary travel expenses and registration fees in amounts fixed by the board.

History.

1979, c. 358, s. 28; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2000-67, s. 11.18.

§ 122C-120.1.
Job classifications; director and finance officer.

The Office of State Human Resources shall develop a job classification for director of an area authority or county program that reflects the skills required of an individual operating a local management entity. The Office of State Human Resources shall also review the job classifications for area authority and county program finance officers to determine whether they reflect the skills necessary to manage the finances of a local management entity. The Commission shall adopt a job classification for director and any new or revised job classifications for finance officers no later than December 31, 2006.

The job classifications developed under subsection (a) of this section shall apply to persons newly hired on or after January 1, 2007.

History.

2006-142, s. 4(h); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 122C-121.
Area director.

The area director is an employee of the area board, shall serve at the pleasure of the board, and shall be appointed in accordance with G.S. 122C-117(7). As used in this subsection, “employee” means an individual and does not include a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability corporation, or any other business association.

(a1)

The area board shall establish the area director’s salary under Article 3 of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes. Notwithstanding G.S. 126-9(b), an area director may be paid a salary that is in excess of the salary ranges established by the State Human Resources Commission. Any salary that is higher than the maximum of the applicable salary range shall be supported by documentation of comparable salaries in comparable operations within the region and shall also include the specific amount the board proposes to pay the director. The area board shall not authorize any salary adjustment that is above the normal allowable salary range without obtaining prior approval from the Director of the Office of State Human Resources.

(a2)

The area board shall not provide the director with any benefits that are not also provided by the area board to all permanent employees of the area program, except that the area board may, in its discretion, offer severance benefits, relocation expenses, or both, to an applicant for the position of director as an incentive for the applicant to accept an offer of employment. The director shall be reimbursed only for allowable employment-related expenses at the same rate and in the same manner as other employees of the area program.

The area board shall evaluate annually the area director for performance based on criteria established by the Secretary and the area board. In conducting the evaluation, the area board shall consider comments from the board of county commissioners.

The area director is the administrative head of the area program. In addition to the duties under

G.S. 122C-111

, the area director shall:

Appoint, supervise, and terminate area program staff.

Administer area authority services.

Develop the budget of the area authority for review by the area board.

Provide information and advice to the board of county commissioners through the county manager.

Act as liaison between the area authority and the Department.

Except when specifically waived by the Secretary, the area director shall meet all the following minimum qualifications:

Masters degree.

Related experience.

Management experience.

Any other qualifications required under

G.S. 122C-120.1

.

History.

1971, c. 470, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1977, c. 568, s. 1; c. 679, s. 7; 1979, c. 358, s. 14; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2001-437, s. 1.12; 2006-142, s. 4(k); 2007-323, s. 6.20(a); 2012-151, s. 11(c); 2013-339, s. 1; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 122C-122.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-151, s. 12(a), effective July 12, 2012.

History.

1977, c. 679, s. 7; c. 725, s. 7; 1979, c. 358, s. 26; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 550, s. 26; repealed by 2012-151, s. 12(a), effective July 12, 2012.

§ 122C-123.
Other agency responsibility.

Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 122C-112(a)(10), G.S. 122C-117(a)(1),

G.S. 122C-127

, and

G.S. 122C-131

, other agencies of the Department, other State agencies, and other local agencies shall continue responsibility for services they provide for persons with developmental disabilities.

History.

1987, c. 830, s. 47(e); 1989, c. 625, s. 14; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 690, s. 11.

§ 122C-123.1.
Area authority reimbursement to State for disallowed expenditures.

Any funds or part thereof of an area authority that are transferred by the area authority to any entity including a firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, agency, or nonprofit private foundation shall be subject to reimbursement by the area authority to the State when expenditures of the area authority are disallowed pursuant to a State or federal audit.

History.

1999-237, s. 11.41.

§ 122C-124.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-437, s. 1.13(a), effective July 1, 2002.

§ 122C-124.1.
Actions by the Secretary when area authority or county program is not providing minimally adequate services.

Notice of Likelihood of Action. — When the Secretary determines that there is a likelihood of suspension of funding, assumption of service delivery or management functions, or appointment of a caretaker board under this section within the ensuing 60 days, the Secretary shall so notify in writing the area authority board or the county program and the board of county commissioners of the area authority or county program. The notice shall state the particular deficiencies in program services or administration that must be remedied to avoid action by the Secretary under this section. The area authority board or county program shall have 60 days from the date it receives notice under this subsection to take remedial action to correct the deficiencies. The Secretary shall provide technical assistance to the area authority or county program in remedying deficiencies.

Suspension of Funding; Assumption of Service Delivery or Management Functions. — If the Secretary determines that a county, through an area authority or county program, is not providing minimally adequate services to persons in need in a timely manner, or fails to demonstrate reasonable efforts to do so, the Secretary, after providing written notification of the Secretary’s intent to the area authority or county program and to the board of county commissioners of the area authority or county program, and after providing the area authority or county program and the boards of county commissioners of the area authority or county program an opportunity to be heard, may:

Withhold funding for the particular service or services in question from the area authority or county program and ensure the provision of these services through contracts with public or private agencies or by direct operation by the Department.Upon suspension of funding, the Department shall direct the development and oversee implementation of a corrective plan of action and provide notification to the area authority or county program and the board of county commissioners of the area authority or county program of any ongoing concerns or problems with the area authority’s or county program’s finances or delivery of services.

Assume control of the particular service or management functions in question or of the area authority or county program and appoint an administrator to exercise the powers assumed. This assumption of control shall have the effect of divesting the area authority or county program of its powers in

G.S. 122C-115.1

and

G.S. 122C-117

and all other service delivery powers conferred on the area authority or county program by law as they pertain to this service or management function. County funding of the area authority or county program shall continue when the State has assumed control of the catchment area or of the area authority or county program. At no time after the State has assumed this control shall a county withdraw funds previously obligated or appropriated to the area authority or county program.Upon assumption of control of service delivery or management functions, the Department shall, in conjunction with the area authority or county program, develop and implement a corrective plan of action and provide notification to the area authority or county program and the board of county commissioners of the area authority or county program of the plan. The Department shall also keep the area authority board and the board of county commissioners informed of any ongoing concerns or problems with the delivery of services.

Appointment of Caretaker Administrator. — In the event that a county, through an area authority or county program, fails to comply with the corrective plan of action required when funding is suspended or when the State assumes control of service delivery or management functions, the Secretary, after providing written notification of the Secretary’s intent to the area authority or county program and the applicable participating boards of county commissioners of the area authority or county program, shall appoint a caretaker administrator, a caretaker board of directors, or both.The Secretary may assign any of the powers and duties of the area director or program director or of the area authority board or board of county commissioners of the area authority or county program pertaining to the operation of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services to the caretaker board or to the caretaker administrator as it deems necessary and appropriate to continue to provide direct services to clients, including the powers as to the adoption of budgets, expenditures of money, and all other financial powers conferred on the area authority or county program by law pertaining to the operation of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services. County funding of the area authority or county program shall continue when the State has assumed control of the financial affairs of the program. At no time after the State has assumed this control shall a county withdraw funds previously obligated or appropriated to the area authority or county program. The caretaker administrator and the caretaker board shall perform all of these powers and duties. The Secretary may terminate the area director or program director when it appoints a caretaker administrator. Chapter 150B of the General Statutes shall apply to the decision to terminate the area director or program director. Neither party to any such contract shall be entitled to damages. After a caretaker board has been appointed, the General Assembly shall consider, at its next regular session, the future governance of the identified area authority or county program.

History.

2001-437, s. 1.13(b); 2008-107, s. 10.15(ee).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 10.15(ee), effective July 1, 2008, deleted “in accordance with rules adopted by the Secretary or the Commission” following “minimally adequate services”
in the introductory language of subsection (b).